Illinois, session 104th, SB3883.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Sections 5-1.7 and 12-4.4a as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-1.7 new)7    Sec. 5-1.7. No work requirement. The Department shall not 8require recipients of medical assistance to work a minimum 9amount of hours in order to maintain eligibility for medical 10assistance. 11    (305 ILCS 5/12-4.4a new)12    Sec. 12-4.4a. No SNAP work requirement. Notwithstanding 13any other law, the Department of Human Services shall not 14require recipients of benefits provided under the Supplemental 15Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) to work a minimum amount 16of hours in order to maintain eligibility for SNAP benefits.